Connecticut, session 2026, HB05182.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
nine million two hundred thousand dollars, the proceeds of which shall
be used by the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection
for the purpose of providing the city of Norwich (1) a grant-in-aid in the
amount of two million dollars to the Laurel Hill Volunteer Fire
Company for capital improvements; (2) a grant-in-aid in the amount of
one million dollars to the East Great Plain Volunteer Fire Department
for capital improvements; and (3) a grant-in-aid in the amount of six
million two hundred thousand dollars to the Norwich Fire Department
for capital improvements and apparatus acquisition.
LCO No. 864 1 of 2

Proposed Bill No. 5182